Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB596.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9025. Report to General Assembly.(a) Report.--The department shall submit a report not later than March 1 of each year to each member of the Senate and House of Representatives. The report shall include the following:(1) The amount of money collected under section 9004(b) (relating to imposition of tax, exemptions and deductions) in each municipality in the preceding calendar year.(2) The gallons of fuel purchased and taxed under section 9004(b) in each municipality in the preceding calendar year.(3) The quantity and type of each liquid fuel sold in each municipality in the preceding calendar year.12345678910111213141516171819 (b) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "municipality" means a county, city, borough, incorporated town or township.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0596PN0603 - 2 - 1234